Utah statutes.
34-44-104.   Void provisions.

Any of the following provisions in an agreement between a sales representative and a principal is void:

(1)  an express waiver of any right under this chapter;

(2)  for a writing required by Section 34-44-201 that is entered into in this state, a provision that makes the sales representative subject to the laws of another state; or

(3)  a requirement that the sales representative pursue a claim under this chapter in a court not located in the state.



Enacted by Chapter 65, 2007 General Session

